Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.010

Grant of license—Term.

The board of county commissioners may grant a license to keep a ferry across any lake or stream within its county, upon being satisfied that a ferry is necessary at the point applied for, which license shall continue in force for a term to be fixed by the commissioners not exceeding five years.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.53.010. Prior: Code 1881 s 3002; 1879 p 61 s 38; 1869 p 280 s 40; 1863 p 521 s 1; 1854 p 354 s 1; RRS s 5462.]